Colorado statutes. TITLE 31 Government - Municipal
PART 2
QUALIFICATIONS AND REGISTRATION OF ELECTORS

31-10-201. Qualifications of municipal electors.

Every person who has attained the age of eighteen years possessing the following qualifications is entitled to register to vote at all municipal elections:

He is a citizen of the United States.

The person is a resident of the municipal precinct and has resided in this state for twenty-two days immediately preceding the election at which the person offers to vote. In order to vote in a municipal election conducted under this article, a person must be a registered elector. An otherwise qualified and registered elector who moves from the municipal election precinct where registered to another precinct within the same municipality is permitted to cast a ballot for an election at the polling place in the precinct where registered.

No person confined in any public prison is entitled to register or to vote at any regular or special election. Every person who was a qualified elector prior to such imprisonment and who is released by pardon or by having served his full term of imprisonment shall be vested with all the rights of citizenship except as otherwise provided in the state constitution.

The judges of election, in determining the residence of a person offering to vote, shall be governed by the following rules, so far as they may be applicable:

The residence of a person is the principal or primary home or place of abode of a person. Principal or primary home or place of abode is that home or place in which his habitation is fixed and to which a person, whenever he is absent, has the present intention of returning after a departure or absence therefrom, regardless of the duration of absence. In determining what is a principal or primary place of abode of a person, the following circumstances relating to such person may be taken into account: Business pursuits, employment, income sources, residence for income or other tax purposes, age, marital status, residence of parents, spouse, and children, if any, leaseholds, situs of personal and real property, and motor vehicle registration.

A person shall not be considered to have lost his residence if he leaves his home and goes into another state or territory or another county or municipality of this state merely for temporary purposes with an intention of returning.

A person shall not be considered to have gained a residence in this state or in any municipality in this state while retaining his home or domicile elsewhere.

If a person moves to any other state or territory with the intention of making it his permanent residence, he shall be considered to have lost his residence in the municipality from which he moved.

If a person moves from one municipality in this state to any other municipality in this state with the intention of making it his permanent residence, he shall be considered and held to have lost his residence in the municipality from which he moved.

If the residence of a person is destroyed or becomes uninhabitable, due to a natural disaster or for any other reason, and the person has the present intention of returning to the residence once it is habitable or returning to a newly constructed residence at the same address, the person may continue to use the address of the destroyed or uninhabitable residence as the person's residence for purposes of this section. The residence given for motor vehicle registration and for state income tax purposes may be different from the address given for voting purposes pursuant to this subsection (3)(f).

For the purpose of voting and eligibility to office, no person is deemed to have gained a residence by reason of his presence or lost it by reason of his absence while in the civil or military service of this state or of the United States, nor while a student at any institution of higher education, nor while kept at public expense in any public prison or state institution unless the person is an employee or a member of the household of an employee of such prison or institution.

The provisions of paragraph (a) of this subsection (4) notwithstanding, no person otherwise qualified under the provisions of this article shall be denied the right to vote at any municipal election solely because he is a student at an institution of higher education if such student, at any time when registration is provided for by law, files with the county clerk and recorder a written affidavit under oath, in such form as may be prescribed, that he has established a domicile in this state, that he has abandoned his parental or former home as a domicile, and that he is not registered as an elector in any other municipality of this state or of any other state. The fact that such affidavit has been filed shall be noted in the registration book.

No provisions of this subsection (4) shall apply to the determination of residence or nonresidence status of students for any college or university purpose.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1040, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 79:

(3)(a) R&RE, p. 279, § 5, effective June 7.

L. 81:

(3)(d) and (3)(e) amended, p. 1498, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 92:

(1)(b) amended, p. 2178, § 39, effective June 2.

L. 94:

(1)(b) amended, p. 1773, § 38, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2014:

(1)(b) amended, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 60, § 14, effective February 18.

L. 2022:

(3)(f) added, (SB 22-152), ch. 100, p. 477, § 3, effective April 13.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-10-201 as it existed prior to 1975.

Cross references:

(1) For the classification of students for tuition purposes, see article 7 of title 23.

(2) For the legislative declaration in HB 14-1164, see section 1 of chapter 2, Session Laws of Colorado 2014.

31-10-202. Submission of question to qualified taxpaying electors - oath.

On any question which is required by law to be submitted to qualified taxpaying electors only, if the question is submitted on paper ballots, such ballots shall be deposited in a separate ballot box reserved for that purpose. If the question is submitted on voting machines, provision shall be made to assure that only registered taxpaying electors are permitted to vote on such question. If the question is to be submitted in precincts using an electronic voting system, provision shall be made to assure that only registered taxpaying electors are permitted to vote on such question.

The governing body, in its discretion, may require each registered taxpaying elector desiring to vote on a question which is submitted to qualified taxpaying electors only to sign a written oath that he has, during the twelve months next preceding the election, paid an ad valorem tax upon property situated within the municipality and owned by said person. If said elector is unable to write, he may request assistance from one of the judges of election, and such judge shall sign and witness said elector's mark.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1042, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-10-202 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-10-203. Registration required.

Except where a statute specifically provides otherwise, no person shall be permitted to vote at any municipal election without first having registered within the time and in the manner required by this section and sections 31-10-204 and 31-10-205.

Registration requirements for municipal elections shall be the same as those governing general elections. Registration with the county clerk and recorder shall constitute registration for municipal elections.

Where a statute specifically allows persons who have qualifications different from registered electors to vote on a particular measure, the governing body may require that each such person desiring to vote sign a written oath before voting that he meets each qualification required to vote on the measure.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1042, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 81:

(1) amended and (3) added, p. 1498, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-10-203 as it existed prior to 1975.

Cross references:

For general election registration requirements, see part 2 of article 2 of title 1.

31-10-204. Municipal clerk as deputy county clerk and recorder.

Each clerk shall serve as a deputy county clerk and recorder for purposes of registration only in the county in which the clerk's municipality is located. The clerk shall register any qualified elector residing in any precinct in such county who appears in person at the clerk's office at any time during which registration is permitted in the office of the county clerk and recorder. The clerk shall promptly deliver the new registration records to the office of the county clerk and recorder.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1042, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 80:

Entire section amended, p. 796, § 58, effective June 5.

L. 87:

Entire section amended, p. 328, § 83, effective July 1.

L. 91:

Entire section amended, p. 640, § 84, effective May 1.

L. 94:

Entire section amended, p. 1773, § 39, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 95:

Entire section amended, p. 857, § 100, effective July 1.

L. 97:

Entire section amended, p. 477, § 22, effective July 1.

L. 2014:

Entire section amended, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 60, § 15, effective February 18.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-10-204 as it existed prior to 1975.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 14-1164, see section 1 of chapter 2, Session Laws of Colorado 2014.

31-10-205. Registration lists.

The county clerk and recorder of each county, no later than the fifth day preceding any municipal election in his or her county or upon receipt of the notice made pursuant to section 31-4-503 (3)(b), shall prepare a complete copy of the list of the registered electors of each municipal election precinct which is located within his or her county and is involved in such municipal election; but, in any municipal election precinct consisting of one or more whole general election precincts, the county registration books for such precinct may be used in lieu of a separate registration list. The registration list for each municipal election precinct shall contain, in alphabetical order, the names and addresses of all registered electors residing within the municipal election precinct whose names appeared on the county registration records at the close of business on the sixth day preceding the municipal election or, when notice is received pursuant to section 31-4-503 (3)(b), at the close of business on the date preceding receipt of such notice. The county clerk and recorder shall certify and deliver such registration lists or registration books to the respective clerks on or before the fifth day preceding the election.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1042, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 87:

Entire section amended, p. 328, § 84, effective July 1.

L. 91:

Entire section amended, p. 754, § 23, effective April 4.

L. 94:

Entire section amended, p. 1773, § 40, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 95:

Entire section amended, p. 857, § 101, effective July 1.

L. 2014:

Entire section amended, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 60, § 16, effective February 18.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-10-205 as it existed prior to 1975.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 14-1164, see section 1 of chapter 2, Session Laws of Colorado 2014.

31-10-206. Delivery and custody of registration book or list.

Prior to the delivery of the registration books or registration lists to the judges of election for use on election day, the clerk shall attach to each book or list his certificate stating that such book or list contains the registration records or names of all registered electors residing in the municipal election precinct and stating the total number of registration records or names contained therein.

At such time as may be set by the clerk, but at least one day prior to the election, one of the judges of election from each precinct may call in person at the office of the clerk for the purpose of receiving the registration book or list and election supplies, or the clerk may deliver the same to one of said judges. The registration book or list shall be delivered to said judge in a sealed envelope or container. Said judge shall have custody of the registration book or list and shall give his receipt therefor. After the closing of the polls on the day of election, he shall seal the registration book or list and deliver it to the election judge selected to deliver the election returns, registration book or list, ballot boxes, if any, and other election papers and supplies to the office of the clerk or to such other place as the clerk may designate as the counting center.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1043, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 79:

(2) amended, p. 1176, § 11, effective July 1.

L. 91:

(1) amended, p. 640, § 85, effective May 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-10-506 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-10-207. Questions answered by elector.

It is the duty of the clerk to ask each person making application for registration, and the person shall answer correctly, the matters contained in section 1-2-204, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1043, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 80:

Entire section amended, p. 414, § 22, effective January 1, 1981.

L. 95:

Entire section amended, p. 857, § 102, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-10-206 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-10-208. Change of address.

For the twenty-two days before and on the day of any municipal election, any registered elector, by appearing in person at the office of the county clerk and recorder, may complete a sworn affidavit for change of address within the county in which the elector is registered, stating that, on the date of the election, the elector is living at the new address in the new precinct within the municipality. Upon the receipt of the request, the county clerk and recorder shall verify the registration of the elector and shall, upon verification, issue or authorize a certificate of registration, showing the information required in section 1-2-216, C.R.S., plus the change of address. The judges shall allow the registered elector to vote in the precinct where the new address is located. The judges of election shall use the certificate of registration as a substitute registration page, entering the date of the election and pollbook ballot number on the certificate and including it with the registration book when it is returned to the clerk following the election.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire section added, p. 358, § 32, effective July 1.

L. 87:

Entire section amended, p. 328, § 85, effective July 1.

L. 92:

Entire section amended, p. 2178, § 40, effective June 2.

L. 93:

Entire section amended, p. 1708, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 94:

Entire section amended, p. 1774, § 41, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 95:

Entire section amended, p. 857, § 103, effective July 1.

L. 2014:

Entire section amended, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 61, § 17, effective February 18.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 14-1164, see section 1 of chapter 2, Session Laws of Colorado 2014.